California statutes. Education Code
(a) The state shall first award each local educational agency, including public charter schools that operate as local educational agencies, the amount the local educational agency would have received under Section 1411 for the 1999 fiscal year.

(b) After calculating the allocations under subdivision (a), the state shall do both of the following:

(1) Allocate 85 percent of any remaining funds to the local educational agencies described in subdivision (a) on the basis of the relative numbers of pupils enrolled in public and private elementary schools and secondary schools within each local educational agency’s territorial jurisdiction.

(2) Allocate 15 percent of the remaining funds to those local educational agencies described in subdivision (a) in accordance with the relative numbers of children living in poverty within each local educational agency’s jurisdiction, as determined by the Superintendent.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 49.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56838.

In each fiscal year for which federal funds are received by the state pursuant to Section 1419 of Title 20 of the United States Code for individuals with exceptional needs between the ages of 3 and 5, inclusive, the portion of funds available for local entitlements that are not reserved for state activities pursuant to subsection (d) of Section 1419 of Title 20 of the United States Code shall be allocated through the annual Budget Act in the following manner:

(a) The state shall first award to each local educational agency, including public charter schools that operate as local educational agencies, the amount the local educational agency would have received under Section 1419 of Title 20 of the United States Code for the 1997 federal fiscal year.

(b) After calculating the allocations under subdivision (a), the state shall do both of the following:

(1) Allocate 85 percent of any remaining funds to those local educational agencies described in subdivision (a) on the basis of the relative numbers of pupils enrolled in public and private elementary schools and secondary schools within each local educational agency’s territorial jurisdiction.

(2) Allocate 15 percent of those remaining funds to the local educational agencies in accordance with the relative number of children within each local educational agency living in poverty, as determined by the Superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 50.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56839.

For purposes of Sections 56837 and 56838, the superintendent shall use the most recent population data, including data on children living in poverty, that are available and are satisfactory to the United States Secretary of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56840.

The federal funding allocations for local entitlements in Sections 56837 and 56838 shall also apply to state agencies that were eligible to receive federal Part B funds pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code as that provision read prior to the enactment of Public Law 105-17, the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act Amendments of 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56841.

(a) Federal funds available through Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and appropriated through the annual Budget Act shall only be used as follows:

(1) For the excess costs of providing special education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs.

(2) To supplement state, local, and other federal funds and not to supplant those funds.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the funds shall not be used to reduce the level of expenditures for the education of individuals with exceptional needs made by the local educational agency from local funds below the level of those expenditures for the preceding fiscal year.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a local educational agency may reduce the level of expenditures from local funds where the reduction is attributable to the following:

(1) The voluntary departure, by retirement or otherwise, or departure for just cause, of special education personnel.

(2) A decrease in the enrollment of individuals with exceptional needs.

(3) The termination of the obligation of the local educational agency, consistent with this part, to provide a program of special education to an individual or individuals with exceptional needs that is an exceptionally costly program, as determined by the Superintendent, because any of the following is applicable:

(A) The child has left the jurisdiction of the local educational agency.

(B) The child has reached the age at which the obligation of the local educational agency to provide a free appropriate public education to the child has terminated.

(C) The child no longer needs the program of special education.

(4) The termination of costly expenditures for long-term purchases, such as the acquisition of equipment or the construction of facilities.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b), for any fiscal year in which the allocation received by a local educational agency under Section 1411(f) of Title 20 of the United States Code exceeds the amount the local educational agency received for the previous fiscal year, the local educational agency may reduce the level of expenditures otherwise required by Section 1413(a)(2)(A)(iii) of Title 20 of the United States Code by not more than 50 percent of the amount of the excess. If a local educational agency exercises the authority under this subdivision, the local educational agency shall use an amount of local funds equal to the reduction in expenditures under this subdivision to carry out activities authorized under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), if the Superintendent determines that a local educational agency is unable to establish and maintain programs of free appropriate public education that meet the requirements of Section 1413(a) of Title 20 of the United States Code, or if the Superintendent has taken action against the local educational agency under Section 1416 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the Superintendent shall prohibit the local educational agency from reducing the level of expenditures under subdivision (d) for that fiscal year.

(f) The amount of funds expended by a local educational agency under Section 1413(f) of Title 20 of the United States Code for early intervening services shall count toward the maximum amount of expenditures the local educational agency may reduce under subdivision (d).

(g) Notwithstanding Section 1413(a)(2)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code or any other provision of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), a local educational agency may use federal special education funds for any fiscal year to carry out a schoolwide program under Section 1114 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), except that the amount so used in any such program shall not exceed the number of individuals with exceptional needs participating in the schoolwide program, multiplied by the amount received by the local educational agency under this article for that fiscal year, and divided by the number of individuals with exceptional needs in the jurisdiction of that local educational agency.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, a local educational agency may also use federal special education funds for other purposes specified in Section 1413(a) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) In accordance with Section 300.208(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a local educational agency may use federal funds received under this article to purchase appropriate technology for recordkeeping, data collection, and related case management activities of teachers and related services personnel providing services described in the individualized education program of individuals with exceptional needs, that is needed for the implementation of those case management activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 35.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56842.

(a) A local educational agency may not use more than 15 percent of the amount the agency receives under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) for any fiscal year, less any amount reduced by the local educational agency pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 1413 of Title 20 of the United States Code, if any, in combination with other amounts, which may include amounts other than education funds, to develop and implement, coordinated, early intervening services, which may include interagency financing structures, for pupils in kindergarten and in grades 1 to 12, inclusive, with a particular emphasis on pupils in kindergarten and in grades 1 to 3, inclusive, who have not been identified as needing special education or related services but who need additional academic and behavioral support to succeed in a general education environment.

(b) The implementation of the coordinated, early intervening services under this section, including activities, reporting, and coordination with the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), shall be carried out by a local educational agency as specified in subsection (f) of Section 1413 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(c) This section does not limit or create a right to a free appropriate public education under this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 53.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56844.

In complying with paragraph (17), regarding the prohibition against supplantation of federal funds, and paragraph (18), regarding maintenance of state financial support for special education and related services, of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the state may not use funds paid to it under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) to satisfy state-mandated funding obligations to local educational agencies, including funding based on pupil attendance or enrollment, or on inflation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 54.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Withholding of Payments [56845. - 56845.]

56845.

(a) The Superintendent may withhold, in whole or in part, state funds or federal funds allocated under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) from a local educational agency after reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing if the Superintendent finds either of the following:

(1) The local educational agency failed to comply substantially with a provision of state law, federal law, or regulations governing the provision of special education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs which results in the failure to comply substantially with corrective action orders issued by the department resulting from monitoring findings or complaint investigations.

(2) The local educational agency failed to implement the decision of a due process hearing officer based on noncompliance with provisions of this part, the implementing regulations, provisions of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or the implementing regulations, which noncompliance results in the denial of, or impedes the delivery of, a free appropriate public education for an individual with exceptional needs.

(b) When the Superintendent determines that a local educational agency made substantial progress toward compliance with state law, federal law, or regulations governing the provision of special education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs, the Superintendent may apportion the state or federal funds withheld from the local educational agency.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, state funds may not be allocated to offset any federal funding intended for individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, and withheld from a local educational agency due to the agency’s noncompliance with state or federal law.

(d) For purposes of this section, in order to enter into contracts with one or more local educational agencies to serve individuals with exceptional needs who are not being served as required under this part, the department is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Autism Training and Information [56846. - 56847.]

56846.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Autism is the fastest growing special education eligibility category for public education in California and the nation. In the years between 1998 and 2002, the number of pupils with autism receiving services in California almost doubled, from 10,360 to 20,377. These numbers have continued to climb at a surprising rate. In 2004, there were 4,427 additional pupils diagnosed with autism, an increase of 18 percent.

(2) Autism is not a rare disorder. It is a major public health problem that must be better addressed by the State Department of Education, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Social Services, the state public school system regional centers, and all other entities assisting children with autism.

(3) Significant gains have been made in the expansion of research related to autism and related neurodevelopmental disorders. The findings of this research need to be more fully disseminated to parents, families, school districts, nonpublic schools, and regional centers throughout the state.

(b) Accordingly, it is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting Schedule (1) of Item 4300-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2006 (Ch. 47, Stats. 2006), which, funded the Autistic Spectrum Disorders Initiative of the State Department of Developmental Services, and this chapter, to allow the identification and dissemination of research-based recommended practices and professional development programs for children with autism to be fully accessible and available to parents and educators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56846.2.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, a “pupil with autism” is a pupil who exhibits autistic-like behaviors, including, but not limited to, any of the following behaviors, or any combination thereof:

(1) An inability to use oral language for appropriate communication.

(2) A history of extreme withdrawal or of relating to people inappropriately, and continued impairment in social interaction from infancy through early childhood.

(3) An obsession to maintain sameness.

(4) Extreme preoccupation with objects, inappropriate use of objects, or both.

(5) Extreme resistance to controls.

(6) A display of peculiar motoric mannerisms and motility patterns.

(7) Self-stimulating, ritualistic behavior.

(b) The definition of “pupil with autism” in subdivision (a) shall not apply for purposes of the determination of eligibility for services pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56847.

(a) (1) The Superintendent shall convene, with input from the University of California, the California State University, relevant fiscal and policy standing committees of the Legislature, the Legislative Blue Ribbon Commission on Autism established under Resolution Chapter 124 of the Statutes of 2005, the State Department of Developmental Services, and other appropriate entities, an advisory committee to develop recommendations identifying the means by which public and nonpublic schools, including charter schools, can better serve pupils with autism and their parents.

(2) The advisory committee shall be composed of parents of children with autism, school district administrators, teachers, representatives of county offices of education, representatives of special education local plan areas, representatives of nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and agencies, autism research specialists, physicians who possess a background or expertise in a pertinent medical field, such as psychiatry or behavioral science, and individuals with a recognized expertise in the best practices for providing instruction to children with autism.

(b) The recommendations developed by the advisory committee shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Developing a policy on the most effective manner of informing schools about the status of educationally related research and outreach services available to children with autism and their families. It is the intent of the Legislature that schools utilize that information to develop educationally related programs and services for children with autism.

(2) Creating a statewide clearinghouse for information on the findings of educationally related research-based, recommended practices to support children with autism that can be disseminated to schools, parents, and other interested parties. These educationally related practices shall include, but are not limited to, the early detection of, and development of, coordinated services to children with autism and the professional development of pertinent individuals.

(3) The feasibility and need for establishing a program that would provide technical assistance to schools on all of the following subjects:

(A) The identification and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders.

(B) The development of research-based programs that best serve children with autism in order for them to succeed academically.

(C) The development of a research-based professional development program to train teachers and administrators on the best practices for providing instruction to children with autism.

(c) The recommendations developed by the advisory committee shall not be construed or applied as state-imposed standards or binding on any individualized education program (IEP) team, special education official, or child with autism. This chapter does not prescribe or define an appropriate educational or habilitative program for a child with autism.

(d) The recommendations developed by the advisory committee do not govern the services and supports provided pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code). This chapter does not prescribe or define an appropriate individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code or an individual program plan pursuant to Sections 4646 to 4648, inclusive, of the Welfare and Institutions Code for a child with autism.

(e) On or before November 1, 2007, the advisory committee shall submit its recommendations to the Legislature and to the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Special Education Programs for Individuals With Exceptional Needs Residing in State Hospitals [56850. - 56865.]

56850.

(a) The purpose of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, is to recognize that individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, between 3 and 21 years of age, residing in California’s state hospitals and developmental centers, are entitled to, under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.), the same access to educational programs as is provided for individuals with exceptional needs residing in our communities.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that services shall be provided in the community near the individual state hospitals and developmental centers to the maximum extent appropriate, and in the least restrictive environment.

(c) It is the further intent of the Legislature to ensure equal access to the educational process and to a full continuum of educational services for all individuals, regardless of their physical residence.

(d) It is the further intent of the Legislature that educational services designated for state hospital or developmental center residents not eligible for services mandated by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) shall not be reduced or limited in any manner as a result of the enactment of this chapter.

(e) It is the further intent of the Legislature that any cooperative agreements to provide educational services for state hospitals and
 developmental centers shall seek to maximize federal financial participation in funding these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56851.

(a) In developing the individualized education program for an individual residing in a state hospital or developmental center who is eligible for services under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), a state hospital or developmental center shall include on its interdisciplinary team a representative of the local educational agency from the district in which the state hospital
 or developmental center is located, and the individual’s state hospital or developmental center teacher, depending on whether the state hospital or developmental center is otherwise working with the local educational agency for the provision of special education programs and related services to individuals with exceptional needs residing in state hospitals and developmental centers. However, if a district or special education local plan area that is required by this section to provide a representative from the district or special education local plan area does not do so, the county office of education shall provide a representative.

(b) The state hospital or developmental center shall reimburse the local educational agency for the costs, including salary, of providing the representative who is qualified to provide, or supervise the provision of, specially designed instruction to meet the unique needs of individuals with exceptional needs.

(c) Once the individual with exceptional needs is enrolled in the community program, the local educational agency providing special education shall be responsible for reviewing and revising the individualized education program with the participation of a representative of the state hospital or developmental center and the educational rights holder, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 56863. The public agency responsible for the individualized education program shall be responsible for all individual protections, including notification and due process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 2.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56852.

In developing the individualized educational program and providing all special education programs and related services to individuals with exceptional needs residing in the state hospitals, the state hospitals shall comply with the requirements of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.), and special education provisions of this part and implementing regulations. Special education and related services shall be provided to each individual residing in a state hospital pursuant to the individualized education program for that individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 26.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56852.5.

The State Department of Education, within its existing program review process, shall specifically review the appropriateness of pupil placement for educational services as designated in the pupil’s individualized education program and the criteria used in determining such placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1201, Sec. 51.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

56853.

(a) This chapter does not affect the continued authority of the State Departments of Developmental Services and State Hospitals over educational programs for individuals not eligible for services under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) nor shall it affect the overall responsibility of the state hospitals and developmental centers for the care, treatment, and safety of individuals with exceptional needs under their control. The state hospitals
 and developmental centers shall continue to render appropriate and necessary developmental services, health related services, psychiatric services, and related services assigned to the state hospitals and developmental centers in the local written agreements, as part of their responsibilities for the care and treatment of state hospital and developmental center residents.

(b) For purposes of this section, “health-related services” shall include services provided by physicians, psychiatrists, psychologists, audiologists, registered nurses, social workers, physical therapists, occupational therapists, psychiatric technicians,
 rehabilitation therapists, and speech language pathologists, and shall be the responsibility of the state hospital or developmental center if the individual with exceptional needs requires these services while in the community program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56854.

(a) The Superintendent and the Directors of the State Departments of Developmental Services and State Hospitals shall develop written interagency agreements to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(b) For each county in which a state hospital is located, the county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education and the administrator of the state hospital, shall develop a local written agreement to carry out the purposes of this chapter. These agreements shall be reviewed and updated annually and may be modified at any time with the concurrence of both parties to the agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 2.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

56855.

For each county in which a state hospital is located the county superintendent of schools shall ensure that appropriate special education and related services are available in the community for which the state hospitals can contract. Such contract shall provide for any eligible individual with exceptional needs residing in the state hospitals whose individualized education program specifies that educational services for that individual should be most appropriately provided, in whole or in part, in a program other than on the hospital grounds. The county board of education shall approve any programs operated by the county superintendent pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1191, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56856.

In order to provide appropriate special education and related services to an individual residing in a state hospital, the State Departments of Developmental Services and State Hospitals shall contract with a county superintendent of schools, nonpublic, nonsectarian school, or other agency to provide all or part of the services that the individual’s individualized education program indicates should be provided in a program other than on state hospital grounds. A contract between a state hospital and a nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall only be entered into when no appropriate public education program is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 3.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

56857.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the State Departments of Developmental Services and State Hospitals from contracting with a local public education agency, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school, or another agency to provide special education and related services on the state hospital grounds for those pupils whose individualized education programs do not indicate that such education and services should be provided in a program other than on state hospital grounds. These contracts shall not involve funds appropriated for purposes of community-based special education programs provided for state hospital pupils pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 4.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

56857.5.

(a) Community school agencies providing school programs on state hospital or developmental center grounds shall begin the orderly transfer of all state hospital or developmental center pupils whose individualized education programs indicate that a community school program is appropriate, to schools located in the community.

(b) All pupils covered by subdivision (a) shall be served in community schools other than on state hospital or developmental center grounds, and the contracting provisions of this chapter shall apply only to pupils in community school programs other than on state hospital or developmental center grounds.

(c) Waivers to subdivisions (a) and (b) may be granted only when approved by the State Superintendent of Public Instruction and either the Director of the State Department of Developmental Services, for individuals receiving developmental disability services pursuant to Division 4.1 (commencing with Section 4400) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or the Director of State Hospitals, for individuals receiving mental health services pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 4.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56858.

(a) On the first day of each month, the State Department of Developmental Services or the State Department of State Hospitals, as appropriate, upon submission of an invoice by the county superintendent of schools, shall pay to the county superintendent of schools the amount projected to cover the cost of hospital or developmental center pupils educated in community school programs.

(b) The amount described in subdivision (a) shall be determined according to procedures agreed by the State Department of Developmental Services or the State Department of State Hospitals, and the State Department of Education.

(c) Upon completion of the fiscal year, the county superintendent of schools shall calculate the actual cost of hospital pupils educated in community schools according to procedures in subdivision (b) approved by the State Department of Developmental Services or the State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Education.

(d) If the calculated actual cost of educating these pupils is greater than the total amount the county superintendent of schools has received for the fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a), the following years’ distribution shall be adjusted accordingly.

(e) The county superintendent of schools shall distribute funds to participating districts on a pro rata basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 5.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56858.5.

(a) A contract prescribed by this chapter shall become effective unless disapproved by the State Department of Finance or State Department of General Services within 20 working days of receipt of the contract. Each department shall have 10 working days to consider the contract.

(b) Contracts shall be submitted to the State Department of Developmental Services or the State Department of State Hospitals, as appropriate, for
 approval before May 15.

(c) A payment shall not be processed before contract approval, and educational services shall not be provided in the community school programs before contract approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 6.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56858.7.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the inclusion of in-kind services or the assignment of state hospital personnel in a contract for services pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Ten percent of the contract costs shall be attributed to in-kind services. In-kind services above 10 percent of the contract costs shall be mutually agreed upon by both parties to the contract. Any disagreement over in-kind services above 10 percent shall not be cause for delaying approval of the contract.

(c) A 60 day prior written notice shall be given by the state hospital to the county superintendent of schools for the initiation or removal of in-kind state hospital classified personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1201, Sec. 60.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

56859.

All certificated state hospital or developmental center employees hired to provide educational services to individuals with exceptional needs shall possess an appropriate California credential in special education. Certificated state hospital or developmental center employees who do not possess appropriate California credentials in special education shall be reassigned to provide educational services to individuals residing in state hospitals and developmental centers who are not eligible for services under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 7.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56860.

Special transportation shall be the responsibility of the state hospital.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1201, Sec. 63.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

56862.

It is not the intent of this chapter to displace educational and related services personnel already employed by the state hospitals under the administration of the State Department of Developmental Services or the State Department of State Hospitals, or to reduce their salaries or other employee benefits.

The State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of State Hospitals shall complete an annual review of the impact that implementation of this act will have in reducing the need for positions in state hospitals due to time spent by residents in community education programs and shall submit a report on its findings to the Department of Finance for approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 5.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

56863.

(a) The state hospital or developmental center, as part of the notification to the educational rights holder of their rights pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.), and this part and implementing regulations, shall notify the educational rights holder of the right that the student can be considered for education programs other than on state hospital or developmental center grounds.

(b) For purposes of this section, “educational rights holder” means a parent, a legal guardian, a conservator, a person acting as a parent of a child, an adult student who is not conserved, a surrogate parent appointed pursuant to Section 300.519 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any other person responsible for protecting the student’s rights and interests with respect to educational or developmental services, including any special education and related services.

(c) Information and records concerning state hospital and developmental center patients in the possession
 of the Superintendent shall be treated as confidential under Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the federal Privacy Act of 1974, Public Law 93-579.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 8.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56864.

Individuals with exceptional needs residing in state hospitals shall not be included within the funding calculation made pursuant to Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 59.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56865.

Funds appropriated by Section 11 of Chapter 1191 of the Statutes of 1980 may be used for remodeling classrooms located in a community school, in addition to the purposes of Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 17785) of Part 10, in order to serve state hospital pupils whose individualized education programs require a community school program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1201, Sec. 66.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 31. EXPERIMENTAL SCHOOL PROGRAMS [58400. - 58806.]



  CHAPTER 2. Individual Instruction [58400. - 58409.]

58400.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that several schools have developed programs of individualized instruction based upon performance criteria, including the integration of vocational education with the regular coursework, which have greatly improved their students’ achievement and that the success of such programs offers great promise for improving the effectiveness of education throughout the state. The Legislature intends to extend the use of individualized instruction programs on a large scale and to immediately organize a comprehensive program of individualized instruction based upon performance criteria in a major urban school district. Such a comprehensive
 program shall:

(a) Address the range of socioeconomic-educational problems of urban school children which will be faced by other urban school districts which may desire to develop individualized instruction programs.

(b) Convert the entire curriculum for kindergarten through 12th grade and articulate the curriculum with a community college.

(c) Fully integrate vocational education with the regular curriculum in order to acquaint students with a variety of career alternatives and to provide them with flexible opportunities to acquire the combination of vocational and academic skills required for their individual educational and career objectives.

(d) Draw together existing experience, techniques, and material in the field of individualized instruction,